Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 5. Driver Retraining Program

§ 721.
Authority to require driver retraining.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, either in his or her discretionary authority under this chapter or upon the recommendation of a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction, may require a motor vehicle operator to attend at his or her own expense a driver retraining course as defined and established by the Department of Motor Vehicles under section 723 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 201

, § 1.

§ 722.
Recommendation of a court.

When a motor vehicle operator is convicted of a violation of subchapters 1 through 5 of chapter 13 of this title involving the operation of a motor vehicle in motion, the judge of the court in which the conviction was obtained may recommend, in writing, to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles that the operator be required to attend a driver retraining course. The judge may delay sentencing the operator until he or she has had an answer to his or her recommendation from the Commissioner.
If advised by the Commissioner that the operator has been ordered to take a driver retraining program, the judge may further delay sentencing the operator for a period not to exceed 90 days.
If the judge receives evidence that the operator has satisfactorily completed a driver retraining course, he or she may then consider all the facts and circumstances of the case and either impose a penalty and costs or waive all or any part of the penalty and costs making a note of the action on the original warrant.
In such cases the court shall in no way be relieved of the duty of filing forthwith upon conviction the report required under section 1709 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 201

, § 2.

§ 723.
Supervision.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may by rule prescribe requirements and standards for driver retraining, operation of a driver retraining program, and qualifications and conduct of the instructors.

Upon application of a person as defined by section 701 of this title, the Commissioner may authorize the establishment and operation of a driver retraining program.

The Commissioner may at any time cancel or revoke a person’s authorization to establish and operate a driver retraining program when he or she is satisfied that the person has failed to comply with the rules of the Commissioner made under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 201

, § 3.

§ 723a.
Operation of course by Department of Motor Vehicles.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may also cause a driver retraining course to be operated by the Department of Motor Vehicles at the times and places and in the manner he or she may determine by rule from time to time.

When an operator required to attend a driver retraining course under this subchapter applies to attend a course operated by the Department, he or she shall pay to the Department a fee set by the Commissioner, but not to exceed $25.00, that shall not be refunded.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 38

(Sp. Sess.), § 2.

§ 724.
Repealed.
1971, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 32.